Vermont, session 2025-2026, H792.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 9 V.S.A. chapter 118 is added to read:
CHAPTER 118. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
Subchapter 1. Liability Standards
§ 4193a. LEGISLATIVE INTENT
(a) Artificial intelligence systems are products that shift decision-making
power and responsibility away from persons to software-based systems, often
without direct human oversight. An artificial intelligence system can be
inherently dangerous due to its capabilities, potential for misuse or
exploitation, and ability to unilaterally evolve.
(b) Developers of sophisticated artificial intelligence systems have an
obligation to make the systems safe when used in reasonably foreseeable ways.
Deployers of these products also have an obligation to ensure that the products
are safe and used in a way that does not materially affect an individual’s rights.
§ 4193b. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Adequate warning or instruction” means a warning that a
reasonably prudent person in the same or similar circumstances would have
provided to a consumer with respect to the danger and communicates sufficient
information on the dangers and safe use of a product.
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 3 of 13
(2) “Artificial intelligence system” means an engineered or machine-
based system that varies in its level of autonomy and that can, for explicit or
implicit objectives, infer from the input it receives how to generate outputs that
can influence physical or virtual environments.
(3) “Consequential decision” means a decision that has either a legal or
similarly significant effect on an individual’s access to the criminal justice
system, housing, employment, credit, education, health care, or insurance.
(4)(A) “Deployer” means a person, including a developer, that operates
an artificial intelligence system for internal use or for use by a third party.
(B) “Deployer” does not include an individual or a small business.
For purposes of this definition, a small business is one with fewer than 20
employees or that has fewer than 10,000 users of its product.
(5) “Design” means the intended or known physical and material
characteristics of a product and includes any intended or known formulation or
content of the product and the usual result of the intended development or
other process used to produce the product, which includes unexpected skills or
behaviors that appear in a product.
(6) “Developer” means a person who designs, codes, produces, owns, or
substantially modifies an artificial intelligence system for internal use or for
use by a third party.
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 4 of 13
(7) “Express warranty” means any material, positive statement,
affirmation of fact, promise, or description relating to a product, including any
sample or model of a product.
(8) “Generative artificial intelligence system” means an artificial
intelligence system that can generate derived synthetic content, such as text,
images, video, and audio, that emulates the structure and characteristics of the
artificial intelligence’s training data.
(9) “Harm” means:
(A) damage to property other than the product itself;
(B) personal physical, financial, or reputational injury;
(C) illness or death;
(D) mental or psychological anguish, emotional harm, or distortion of
a person’s behavior that would be highly offensive to a reasonable person; or
(E) any loss of consortium or services or other loss deriving from any
type of harm described in this subdivision (9).
(10) “High-impact artificial intelligence system” means any artificial
intelligence system, regardless of the number of parameters and supervision
structure, that:
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 5 of 13
(A) is used, or reasonably foreseeable as being used:
(i) as a controlling factor in making a consequential decision;
(ii) to categorize groups of persons by protected characteristics,
such as race, ethnic origin, or religious belief;
(iii) in the direct management or operation of critical
infrastructure;
(iv) in a vehicle, a medical device, or the safety system of a
vehicle or medical device; or
(v) to engage in a synthetic relationship; or
(B) exhibits, or could be easily modified to exhibit, high levels of
performance at tasks that pose a serious risk to economic security, public
health or safety, or any combination of those matters.
(11) “Intimate visual depiction” has the meaning as in 15 U.S.C. § 6851.
(12) “Material fact” means any specific characteristic or quality of the
product, but does not include a general opinion about, or praise of, the product
or its quality.
(13)(A) “Product” means a high-impact artificial intelligence system or
a generative artificial intelligence system.
(B) “Product” does not include a product used strictly for peer-
reviewed scientific research.
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 6 of 13
(14) “Synthetic relationship” means a series of interactions between an
individual and an artificial intelligence system that mimics human interaction
and emotional responses.
§ 4193c. DEVELOPER LIABILITY
(a) Limited liability. In a products liability action pursuant to this
subchapter, a developer shall be liable to a plaintiff only if the plaintiff
establishes that the developer failed to exercise reasonable care with respect to:
(1) the design of the product, and that the defective design was a
proximate cause of harm to the plaintiff;
(2) providing adequate instructions or warnings applicable to the
product that caused the harm that is the subject of the complaint, and that the
failure to provide adequate instructions or warnings was a proximate cause of
harm to the plaintiff; or
(3) providing an express warranty applicable to the product that caused
the harm that is the subject of the complaint, and that the product failed to
conform to the warranty, which caused harm to the plaintiff.
(b) Design defect.
(1) In an action alleging that a product is unreasonably dangerous
because of a defective design, the plaintiff shall prove by a preponderance of
the evidence that, at the time the product left the developer’s control:
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 7 of 13
(A) the developer knew or, considering then-existing scientific and
technical knowledge, reasonably should have known of the danger that caused
the plaintiff’s harm;
(B) the developer accounted for both intended uses and reasonably
foreseeable unintended uses of the developer’s systems; and
(C) there existed a technologically feasible and practical alternative
design, including a consideration of the product release and method of
development, that would have reduced or avoided a foreseeable risk of harm
without significantly impairing the usefulness of the product to the group of
persons who are the intended and legitimate users of the product.
(2) For purposes of subdivision (1)(C) of this subsection:
(A) “Method of development” means the selection of training data
used for the product and includes training, testing, auditing, and fine-tuning of
the product.
(B) “Product release” means the specific way in which a product is
integrated and made accessible within a production environment, including
how it interacts with data sources, delivers predictions or results, and is
accessed by users
(c) Failure to warn. The following applies in an action against a developer
in which the claim alleges that the developer failed to provide an adequate
instruction or warning:
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 8 of 13
(1) The plaintiff shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that, at
the time the product left the developer’s control, the developer knew or,
considering then-existing scientific and technical knowledge, reasonably
should have known of the danger that caused the plaintiff’s harm.
(2)(A) The developer shall not be liable for failure to provide adequate
instruction or warning about a danger that is known or open and obvious to the
user or consumer of the product or should have been known or open and
obvious to the user or consumer of the product, considering the characteristics
of, and the ordinary knowledge common to, the persons who ordinarily use or
consume the product.
(B) A danger is presumed to not be open and obvious to a user or
consumer of the product who is under 18 years of age.
(d) Express warranty. A product may be unreasonably dangerous because
it did not conform to an express warranty only if the plaintiff proves by a
preponderance of the evidence that:
(1) the plaintiff reasonably relied on an express warranty made by the
developer about a material fact concerning the safety of the product;
(2) this express warranty proved to be untrue; and
(3) had the representation been true, the plaintiff would not have been
harmed.
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 9 of 13
(e) Safe harbor for developers. In a products liability action brought
against a developer pursuant to this subchapter, a court shall recognize a
rebuttable presumption that a product is not defective if, and only if, that
developer has:
(1) conducted a documented testing, evaluation, verification, validation,
and auditing of that system consistent with industry best practices;
(2) mitigated foreseeable risks to the extent possible and has considered
alternatives;
(3) disclosed foreseeable risks and mitigation tactics directly to
deployers and consumers using the product;
(4) maintained and made available upon request by the Attorney
General an artificial intelligence data sheet that includes, at a minimum, the
following information:
(A) information on the intended contexts and uses of the artificial
intelligence system in accordance with industry best practices;
(B) information regarding the datasets upon which the artificial
intelligence system was trained, including sources, volume, whether the dataset
is proprietary, and how the datasets further the intended purpose of the
product;
(C) accounting of foreseeable risks identified and steps taken to
manage them consistent with industry best practices; and
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 10 of 13
(D) results of red-teaming testing and steps taken to mitigate
identified risks, consistent with industry best practices;
(5) if the product is designed for or is reasonably likely to be used by
individuals under 18 years of age:
(A) documented assessments of use of the product’s impact on
cognitive and emotional development;
(B) implemented age-gating or content restrictions for a product that
poses foreseeable risks; and
(C) provided to deployers and direct consumers and their guardians
clear, accessible disclosures about potential risks; and
(6) prominently included in the terms and conditions of a product the
information included in the artificial intelligence data sheet maintained
pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection, which deployers of such product
may rely upon when making fit-for-use and deployment decisions.
§ 4193d. DEPLOYER LIABILITY
(a) Liability as developer. A deployer shall be deemed to be liable as a
developer pursuant to section 4193c of this subchapter, subject to subsections
(b) and (c) of this section, for harm caused by a product if the deployer:
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 11 of 13
(1) makes a material and substantial change to the product; or
(2) intentionally misuses the product contrary to an express warranty
provided by the developer of the product and that misuse was a proximate
cause of harm to the plaintiff.
(b) Intended use. Use of the product by a deployer that was an intended
use by the developer of the product is not misuse or alteration nor does it
constitute a material or substantial change of the product. If a developer does
not specify an intended use for the product, intended use shall be inferred by
the targeted market and manner of distribution.
(c) Licensing. A deployer licensing a product shall not be liable to a
plaintiff for a violation of subsection 4193c(a) of this subchapter solely due to
the deployer’s ownership or use of the product.
(d) Safe harbor for deployers. In a products liability action brought
pursuant to this subchapter against a deployer, a court shall recognize a
rebuttable presumption that a product is not defective if, and only if, the
deployer has designed and implemented a risk management policy that:
(1) specifies the principles, processes, and personnel that the deployer
shall use in maintaining the risk management policy to identify, mitigate, and
document any risk, especially those impacting individuals under 18 years of
age, that is a reasonably foreseeable consequence of deploying or using such a
system;
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 12 of 13
(2) is consistent with industry best practices;
(3) is reasonable considering the:
(A) size and complexity of the deployer;
(B) nature and scope of the system, including the intended uses and
unintended uses and the modifications made to the system by the deployer; and
(C) data that the system, once deployed, processes as inputs; and
(4) is electronically available to employees of the deployer and to the
Attorney General upon request.
§ 4193e. APPLICABILITY
(a) Supplemental. This subchapter shall supplement any existing common
law tort liability and State product liability laws and shall not prohibit any
product liability cause of action involving a generative artificial intelligence
system or a high-impact artificial intelligence system brought under a different
claim pursuant to product liability common law or statute.
(b) Joint fault. In a liability action brought under this subchapter:
(1) the court shall apply a comparative negligence standard, whereby a
plaintiff’s recovery shall be diminished in proportion to the percentage of fault
attributable to the plaintiff, and developers and deployers may be held jointly
and severally liable for the portion of harm that contributed to the plaintiff’s
injury; and
VT LEG #386292 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.792
2026 Page 13 of 13
(2) the damages for which a deployer is otherwise liable shall be
reduced by the percentage of responsibility for the plaintiff’s harm attributable
to a violation of section 4193c of this subchapter by another person if the
deployer establishes that such percentage of the plaintiff’s harm was
proximately caused by a violation of section 4193c of this subchapter.
§ 4193f. ENFORCEMENT
(a) A developer or deployer that violates this subchapter or rules adopted
pursuant to this subchapter commits an unfair and deceptive act in commerce
in violation of section 2453 of this title.
(b) The Attorney General shall have the same authority under this
subchapter to make rules, conduct civil investigations, bring civil actions, and
enter into assurances of discontinuance as provided under chapter 63 of this
title.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386292 v.1